District of Columbia statutes.
7-2271.05

Confidentiality of information.

(a)

All information and records generated by the Commission, including statistical compilations and reports, and all information and records acquired by, and in the possession of, the Commission are confidential.

(b)

Except as permitted by this section, information and records of the Commission shall not be disclosed voluntarily, pursuant to a subpoena, in response to a request for discovery in any adjudicative proceeding, or in response to a request made under subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-531 et seq.], nor shall it be introduced into evidence in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding.

(c)

Commission information and records may be disclosed only as necessary to carry out the Commission’s duties and purposes. The information and records may be disclosed by the Commission to another Homeland Security Commission if the other commission is governed by confidentiality provisions which afford the same or greater protections as those provided in this subchapter.

(d)

Information and records presented to the Commission shall not be immune from subpoena or discovery, or prohibited from being introduced into evidence, solely because the information and records were made available to the Commission, if the information and records could have been obtained through other sources.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 205, 54 DCR 794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 157(b), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (c).